Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-904 Interest on general
pecuniary devise. General pecuniary devises bear interest at the legal
rate beginning one year after the first appointment of a personal
representative until payment, unless a contrary intent is indicated by the
will. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next